Hawaii, session 2026, SB2355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g)  The director of transportation shall adopt necessary rules for the administration of inspections and the issuance of certificates of inspection; provided that the rules shall: (1)  At a minimum, require inspections to ensure that a vehicle or moped is not equipped with a muffler or exhaust system that fails to comply with section 291‑24 or 291-24.5, as applicable; [and] (2)  Include head lamp requirements that adhere to the specifications pursuant to section 291-25(a), as applicable[.]; and (3)  For a passenger car, allow for mobile vehicle safety inspections to be conducted at any location determined by the vehicle owner and inspector." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.